Hawaii, session 2026, HB415.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  The legislature finds that Act 53, Session Laws of Hawaii 2017, extended the prohibition on counties from requiring the installation or retrofitting of automatic fire sprinklers or automatic fire sprinkler systems in new or existing detached residential one- and two-family dwelling units and nonresidential agricultural and aquacultural buildings and structures located outside of urban areas.  Because of their reliability and effectiveness in suppressing a fire in its initial stages, national residential building codes have required residential fire sprinklers since 2009. The legislature believes that prohibiting measures to improve and enhance fire survivability and reduce fire losses of community residents by eighty per cent, which may be considered and adopted at the local level, presents a needless risk to public fire safety.  Further, residential fire sprinklers greatly reduce the spread of fire, thereby significantly lessening property damage and loss. The legislature further finds that the intensity, severity, and spread of fire in residential buildings are directly related to the contents and furnishings inside. Although improvements have been made in building construction, design, and materials, the volatility and toxicity of today's synthetic materials cause untenable conditions to be reached more rapidly. The legislature recognizes that the counties face unique challenges and issues relating to fire protection, including population density, proximity of structures, infrastructure, access, and limited fire protection resources. Therefore, this Act recognizes and establishes individual county authority. The legislature notes that, according to a report by the National Fire Protection Association's Fire Sprinkler Initiative, twenty states currently allow counties to adopt codes that require installation and retrofitting of fire sprinklers in residential family units. The legislature also finds that the state building code council is responsible for adopting, amending, and updating building codes and standards in the State. In 2024, the state building code council adopted the state residential code, which requires all state construction of new one- and two-family dwellings to install residential fire sprinklers.  The 2024 international residential code, made part of the state building code, requires automatic sprinkler systems to be installed in newly constructed residential dwelling units. Accordingly, the purpose of this Act is to amend Act 83, Session laws of Hawaii 2012, to repeal section 46-19.8, Hawaii Revised Statutes, on June 30, 2025. SECTION 2. Act 83, Session Laws of Hawaii 2012, as amended by section 1 of Act 53, Session Laws of Hawaii 2017, is amended by amending section 3 to read as follows: "SECTION 3.  This Act shall take effect on July 1, 2012; provided that on June 30, [2027,] 2025, this Act shall be repealed." SECTION 3. Statutory material to be repealed is bracketed and stricken.  New statutory material is underscored. SECTION 4. This Act shall take effect on June 29, 2025. INTRODUCED BY: _____________________________ By Request